District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-1217.33n

Applicability.

Repealed.

History

Nov. 25, 2008, D.C. Law 17-278, § 15, 55 DCR 11050
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 7004, 57 DCR 181

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 7004 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 7004 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).